Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 2. Formation of Cooperatives.

Sec. 10.15.335.
Procedure for incorporation.

Three or more natural persons at least 19 years of age may act as incorporators of a cooperative by signing and delivering articles for the cooperative in duplicate to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 38(1) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 21 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Collateral references. —

54 Am. Jur. 2d, Monopolies, Restraints of Trade, and Unfair Trade Practices, § 177.

58 C.J.S., Monopolies, § 178.

Sec. 10.15.340.
Filing of articles.

Upon finding that the articles conform to law, the commissioner shall, when all fees prescribed in this chapter have been paid,

stamp on each duplicate original the word “filed” and the date of the filing;

file one duplicate original in the commissioner’s office;

issue a certificate of incorporation and affix the other duplicate original to the certificate.

The certificate of incorporation together with the duplicate original affixed to it by the commissioner shall be returned to the incorporators or their representative.

History.

(§ 38(2) — (3) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.345.
Effect of certificate of incorporation.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of incorporation, the corporate existence begins, and the certificate of incorporation is conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the incorporators have been complied with and that the cooperative has been incorporated under this chapter, except as against the state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of incorporation or for involuntary dissolution of the cooperative.

History.

(§ 38(4) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.350.
Contents of articles of incorporation; director liability.

The articles of incorporation must set forth

the name of the cooperative and that it is a cooperative;

the period of duration, which may be perpetual;

the purposes for which the cooperative is organized;

whether the cooperative is organized with or without membership stock, the amount of the membership fee, and the limitations, if any, on transfer of a membership;

the number and par value, if any, of shares of each authorized class of stock, and if more than one class is authorized, the designation, preferences, limitations and relative rights of each class;

which classes of stock, if any, are membership stock, and the limitations upon transfer, if any, applicable to the classes of membership stock;

any limitation of the right to acquire or recall stock;

the basis of distribution of assets in the event of dissolution or liquidation;

the address of its initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at that address;

the number of directors, not less than three, constituting the initial board of directors and the names and addresses of the persons who are to serve as directors until the first annual meeting of the members or until their successors are elected and take office;

the name and address of each incorporator.

In addition to the matters required to be set out in the articles of incorporation by (a) of this section, the articles of incorporation may also contain a provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the corporation or its members for monetary damages for the breach of fiduciary duty as a director. The articles of incorporation may not eliminate or limit the liability of a director for

a breach of a director’s duty of loyalty to the corporation;

acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

wilful or negligent conduct involved in the payment of dividends or the redemption of stock from other than lawfully available funds; or

a transaction from which the director derives an improper personal benefit.

The provisions of (b) of this section do not eliminate or limit the liability of a director for an act or omission that occurs before the effective date of the articles of incorporation or of an amendment to the articles of incorporation authorized by (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 39(1) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 148 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.15.355.
Other provisions in articles; relationship of articles to bylaws.

It is not necessary to set forth in the articles the corporate powers enumerated in this chapter.
The articles may include additional provisions, not inconsistent with law, for the regulation of the internal affairs of the cooperative, including any provision which under this chapter is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws.
A provision required or permitted in the bylaws has equal force and effect if stated in the articles.
Whenever a provision of the articles is inconsistent with a bylaw, the articles control.

History.

(§ 39(2) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.360.
Organizational meeting of directors.

After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation an organizational meeting of the board of directors named in the articles shall be held, either inside or outside the state, at the call of a majority of the incorporators for the purpose of adopting bylaws, electing officers and transacting such other business as may come before the meeting.

History.

(§ 40 ch 107 SLA 1959)